North Carolina, session 2025, SB289.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($237,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to The Stagville
Memorial Project to support the design and development of an art installation honoring the
history of the Stagville descendants on a plot of land across from the Museum of Durham History
in the City of Durham.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S289-v-1*